Mississippi statutes. Title 39. Libraries, Arts, Archives and History
Mississippi De Soto Trail Commission

§ 39-5-101.
Short title.

Sections 39-5-101 through 39-5-113 shall be known and may be cited as the “Mississippi De Soto Trail Commission Act.”

HISTORY:
Laws, 1988, ch. 593, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved May 25, 1988).

§ 39-5-103.
Definitions.

For the purposes of Sections 39-5-101 through 39-5-113, the following words shall have the meanings ascribed herein unless the context shall otherwise require:

“United States De Soto Expedition Commission” means the commission which was created by Public Resolution 57 of the Seventy-fourth Congress and approved August 26, 1935.

“Final Report of the United States De Soto Expedition Commission” means the final report and recommendation of the commission to Congress which was required by Public Resolution 57 of the Seventy-fourth Congress. Such document is identified as House Document Number 71, 76th Congress, 1st Session, printed by the United States Government Printing Office in 1939, and reprinted in 1985 in the Smithsonian Institution’s Classics of Anthropology Series.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1988, ch. 593, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved May 25, 1988).

§ 39-5-105.
Creation of De Soto Trail Commission; composition; appointment of members.

There is hereby created in this state a De Soto Trail Commission, which shall be composed of one (1) representative from each state university to be appointed by the president of that institution and one (1) member from each county through which the Hernando de Soto Expedition traveled based on the alternate routes of the Final Report of the United States De Soto Expedition Commission. The county members of the commission shall be appointed by the Governor.

Four (4) additional members from the state at large shall be appointed by the Board of Trustees of the Department of Archives and History. The director of the Department of Archives and History shall serve as an ex officio member of the commission. The Department of Archives and History shall provide support services for the commission’s meetings.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1988, ch. 593, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved May 25, 1988).

§ 39-5-107.
Terms of office and compensation of members of commission; acceptance of gifts, donation, etc.; deposit of funds.

The members of the De Soto Trail Commission shall serve for a term of four (4) years beginning July 2, 1988. Their successors shall be appointed in the manner provided for the members first appointed, and a vacancy occurring before the expiration of a term shall be similarly filled for the unexpired term. The Governor shall fill all vacancies within sixty (60) days after such vacancy occurs. Vacancies that have not been filled within sixty (60) days shall be filled by appointments made by the Board of Trustees of the Department of Archives and History. Any member of the commission may be reappointed by the Governor to serve additional terms. A member of the commission may be removed only for disability, neglect of duty, or incompetence in office. A member shall be entitled to a hearing before removal from office.

Members of the commission shall serve without compensation, expense allowance, or mileage allowance. The commission shall be authorized to accept gifts, donations and/or contributions from individuals, businesses, organizations, governmental entities and from any other sources for the purposes set forth herein. No funds shall be appropriated to the commission by the Legislature.

Any funds or donations received by the commission shall be deposited by the Department of Archives and History into a special fund which is hereby created in the State Treasury, and disbursements therefrom shall be made upon warrants by the State Fiscal Management Board after receipt of requisitions submitted by the Department of Archives and History upon authorization by the commission. Monies in the special fund may be used by the commission in preparing and filing reports and in fulfilling its duties and responsibilities under Sections 39-5-101 through 39-5-113.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1988, ch. 593, § 4, eff from and after passage (approved May 25, 1988).

§ 39-5-109.
Election of officers and adoption of rules and regulations; use of existing research.

The De Soto Trail Commission shall meet within thirty (30) days after the last member has been appointed for the purpose of electing officers and adopting rules and regulations. The commission shall use the Final Report of the United States De Soto Expedition Commission as a preliminary basis for its work and shall take cognizance of such scholarly archaeological and historical research pertaining to the problem of De Soto’s route as has appeared since the completion of the commission’s work.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1988, ch. 593, § 5, eff from and after passage (approved May 25, 1988).

§ 39-5-111.
Erection of markers.

The commission shall designate specific sites for erection of appropriate markers along Hernando de Soto’s journey of one hundred eighty-seven (187) days through Mississippi from the Tombigbee River basin on our state’s eastern boundary, westward to the place of discovery of the Mississippi River on May 8, 1541.

The commission shall be authorized to purchase appropriate markers from any of its available funds. The texts for the De Soto Trail markers shall be approved by the Department of Archives and History. The State Highway Department shall cooperate with the commission and Department of Archives and History by erecting and maintaining the markers that have been approved by the commission.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1988, ch. 593, § 6, eff from and after passage (approved May 25, 1988).

§ 39-5-113.
Duties and responsibilities of commission.

The commission shall cooperate and work with the citizens and elected officials in the various counties where the trail is located and shall promote and publicize the De Soto Trail in this state and abroad. The commission will strive to reconcile local interests with the results of bona fide scholarly research.

The commission shall encourage and support Mississippi’s participation in the regional De Soto Trail Commission that is comprised of representatives from the states through which the De Soto Expedition traveled. The commission shall cooperate with the Regional De Soto Trail Commission and the National Park Service in their efforts to establish a National De Soto Trail as part of the National Trails System.

The commission shall support and encourage scholarly research in archaeology and history related to the De Soto Expedition. The Department of Archives and History shall undertake to publish the results of such research in The Journal of Mississippi History or Mississippi Archaeology in order to make the results of the research available to the citizens of Mississippi.

The commission shall plan, promote, and coordinate a statewide commemoration or festival which shall be held in May, 1991 in recognition of the 450th anniversary of Hernando de Soto’s Expedition in our state, and may schedule other appropriate ceremonies to commemorate the De Soto Expedition.

The commission shall file with the Legislature and Governor a complete report of its activities by August 30 of each year. The commission’s minutes and other permanent records shall be deposited in the Department of Archives and History.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1988, ch. 593, § 7, eff from and after passage (approved May 25, 1988).